Utah statutes.
31A-17-502.   Reserve valuation.

The commissioner shall annually value, or cause to be valued, the reserve liabilities (also called "reserves" in this part) for all outstanding life insurance policies and annuity and pure endowment contracts of every life insurance company doing business in this state, and may certify the amount of any such reserves, specifying the mortality table or tables, rate or rates of interest, and methods (net level premium method or other) used in the calculation of such reserves. In calculating such reserves, he may use group methods and approximate averages for fractions of a year or otherwise. In lieu of the valuation of the reserves required in this part of any foreign or alien company, he may accept any valuation made, or caused to be made, by the insurance supervisory official of any state or other jurisdiction when such valuation complies with the minimum standard provided in this part, and if the official of such state or jurisdiction accepts as sufficient and for all valid legal purposes the certificate of valuation of the commissioner when such certificate states the valuation to have been made in a specified manner according to which the aggregate reserves would be at least as large as if they had been computed in the manner prescribed by the law of that state or jurisdiction.

